Washington statutes.
RCW 42.36.020

Members of local decision-making bodies.

No member of a local decision-making body may be disqualified by the appearance of fairness doctrine for conducting the business of his or her office with any constituent on any matter other than a quasi-judicial action then pending before the local legislative body.

[ 1982 c 229 s 2.]